src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON п_0
+A: п_0_inflect ;

LEXICON п_0_inflect
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat: # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins: # ;
+Pl+Nom: # ;
+Inan+Pl+Acc: # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc: # ;
+Pl+Gen: # ;
+Pl+Loc: # ;
+Pl+Dat: # ;
+Pl+Ins: # ;

LEXICON п_a
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_compEnd
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a_пф_нет
+A: SF_a ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;
+A: SF_comp_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON п_as_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_stem_Prb ;

LEXICON п_as
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_as~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_Prb ;

LEXICON п_as~s
п_as~ ;

LEXICON п_a~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;

LEXICON п_a~_кф_нет
+A: LF_stem ;

LEXICON п_a?
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a?~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a~_кф_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a_FemPrb ;

LEXICON п_a~_пф_нет
+A: SF_a ;

LEXICON п_a—
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF—_a ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_кф_м_затрудн.
п_a— ;

LEXICON п_a_кф_м_нет
п_a— ;

LEXICON п_2a1
+A:нь LF_stem ;
+A: SF1_a_soft ;
+A:нь SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a1
+A:н LF_stem ;
+A: SF1_a ;
+A:н SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a1—
+A:н LF_stem ;
+A: SF1—_a ;
+A:н SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a1_кф_м_затрудн.
п_a1— ;

LEXICON п_a[1]
+A:н LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fен SF_a ;
+A: SF1_a_Fac ;
+A:н SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a2
+A:н LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;
+A:н SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_искренний
+A:ь LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a ;
+A:ь SF_a ;
+A:ь SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_счастливый
+A:счастли́в LF_stem ;
+A:сча́стлив SF_a ;
+A:счастли́в SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a_т_ч
+A:т LF_stem ;
+A:т SF_a ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/b
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/b_маленький
+A:ма́леньк LF_stem ;
+A:ма́л SF_b ;
+A:ме́ньше SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a/b_малый
+A:ма́л LF_stem ;
+A:ма́л SF_b ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:ме́ньше # ;

LEXICON п_a/b_хороший
+A:хоро́ш LF_stem ;
+A:хоро́ш SF_b ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:лу́чше # ;

LEXICON п_a/b_ёгок_егч
+A:ёгк LF_stem ;
+A:ёг%^Fок SF_b ;
+A:е́г SF_comp_ЧЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/b~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b ;

LEXICON п_a/b~_кф_затрудн._(кроме_кф_м)
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b_NonMscSFPrb ;

LEXICON п_a/bs~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b ;

LEXICON п_a/b'
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/cs
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c_кф_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c_FemPrb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c_дешевый
+A:дешёв LF_end ;
+A:дёшев SF_b ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:деше́вле # ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:дешеве́е # ;

LEXICON п_a/c_г_ьш
+A:г LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fог SF_c ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ШЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c_док_ж
+A:дк LF_stem ;
+A:д%^Fок SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c_док_щ
+A:дк LF_stem ;
+A:д%^Fок SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c_к_ч(е)
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:к SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:че́е # ;

LEXICON п_a/c_ок_(че)
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c_ок_(ь)ч
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a/c_ст_щ
+A:ст LF_stem ;
+A:ст SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/cs~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a/c~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c ;

LEXICON п_a/c~_оленый
+A:олён LF_stem ;
+A:о́лон SF_c ;

LEXICON п_a/c~_есёлый
+A:есёл LF_stem ;
+A:е́сел SF_c ;

LEXICON п_a/c~_кф_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c_FemPrb ;

LEXICON п_a/c~_пф_нет
+A: SF_c ;

LEXICON п_a/c_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_end_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a/c'
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'(PlStressed)
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c'(PlStressed) ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_короткий
+A:коро́тк LF_stem ;
+A:ко́рот%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:коро́че # ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_еселый
+A:есёл LF_stem ;
+A:е́сел SF_c' ;
+A:есёл SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_еленый
+A:елён LF_stem ;
+A:е́лен SF_c' ;
+A:елён SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_оленый
+A:олён LF_stem ;
+A:о́лон SF_c' ;
+A:олон SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_олодный
+A:оло́дн LF_stem ;
+A:о́лод%^Fен SF_c' ;
+A:оло́дн SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_д_ж
+A:д LF_stem ;
+A:д SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_док_ж
+A:дк LF_stem ;
+A:д%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ек_ч(е́)
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fек SF_c' ;
+A:к SF_comp_end ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:че́е # ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_зок_ж
+A:зк LF_stem ;
+A:з%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ок_ч(е)
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A:к SF_comp_end ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:че́е # ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ок_ьч
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ЧЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ок_ьш
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_c' ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ст_щ
+A:ст LF_stem ;
+A:ст SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c'_ьк_чш
+A:ьк LF_stem ;
+A:ь%^Fек SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;
+A: SF_comp_ШЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c's~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c'_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a/c'~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c' ;

LEXICON п_a/c''
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c'' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a/c''_ок_0
+A:о́к LF_stem ;
+A:о́к SF_c'' ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:е # ;

LEXICON п_a/c''_ок_ж
+A:о́к LF_stem ;
+A:о́к SF_c'' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c''_сок_ш
+A:со́к LF_stem ;
+A:со́к SF_c'' ;
+A: SF_comp_ШЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c''_ёк_ьш
+A:ёк LF_stem ;
+A:ёк SF_c'' ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ШЕ ;

LEXICON п_a/c''~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_c'' ;

LEXICON п_a/b2
+A:н LF_stem ;
+A: SF_b ;
+A:н SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a'
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a'_ёсток_ёстч/естч
+A:ёстк LF_stem ;
+A:ёст%^Fок SF_a' ;
+A:е́ст SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;
+A:ёст SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a'_ок_(ь)ч
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ЧЕ ;

LEXICON п_a'_ск_щ
+A:ск LF_stem ;
+A:с%^Fок SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_a'_compStem
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_stem ;

LEXICON п_a'_кф_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a'_FemPrb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a'_кф_м_и_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a'_MscFemPrb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_a'~
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a' ;

LEXICON п_a'~_кф_ж_затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a'_FemPrb ;

LEXICON п_a'_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_stem ;
+A: SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_end_Prb ;

LEXICON п_a'_compPrb_к_(ь)ч
+A:к LF_stem ;
+A:%^Fок SF_a' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;
+A:ь SF_comp_ЧЕ_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b_большой
+A:больш LF_end ;
+A:вели́к SF_b ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:бо́льше # ;

LEXICON п_b_кф_м_затрудн.
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b_MscPrb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b ;

LEXICON п_b~_большой
+A:больш LF_end ;
+A:вели́к SF_b ;

LEXICON п_b~_пф_нет
+A: SF_b ;

LEXICON п_b/c
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c_развитой
+A:развит LF_end ;
+A:ра́звит SF_c ;
+A:развит SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c_олодой
+A:олод LF_end ;
+A:о́лод SF_c ;
+A:оло́ SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_b/c_олостой
+A:олост LF_end ;
+A:о́лост SF_c ;
+A:олост SF_comp_end_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c_орогой
+A:орог LF_end ;
+A:о́рог SF_c ;
+A:оро́г SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c_д_ж
+A:д LF_end ;
+A:д SF_c ;
+A: SF_comp_ЖЕ ;

LEXICON п_b/cs
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/c~_развитой
+A:развит LF_end ;
+A:ра́звит SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/c~_олодой
+A:олод LF_end ;
+A:о́лод SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/c~_орогой
+A:орог LF_end ;
+A:о́рог SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/cs~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c'
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_плохой
+A:плох LF_end ;
+A:пло́х SF_c' ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:ху́же # ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_дурной
+A:н LF_end ;
+A:%^Fен SF_c' ;
+A:%^Fён SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_ст_щ
+A:ст LF_end ;
+A:ст SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_т_ч
+A:т LF_end ;
+A:т SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;
